dictionaries/fi_FI/src/hunspell/fi_FI.dic
aaltoileva/W
alentava/W
alistava/W
alkava/W
aloitteleva/W
alustava/W
ammuttava/W
antautuva/W
arvostava/W
asettuva/W
asteleva/W
astuva/W
asuva/W
autoileva/W
avartava/W
avustava/W
deformoituva/W
ennustava/W
erottuva/W
haastava/W
haettava/W
haihatteleva/W
haiseva/W
hajoava/W
hakeva/W
hallitseva/W
halventava/W
hankaloittava/W
hapottuva/W
harhaanjohtava/W
harmahtava/W
harrastava/W
hautova/W
havaitseva/W
heijastava/W
heiluttava/W
herjaava/W
hidastava/W
hilautuva/W
hiottava/W
hohtava/W
holhoava/W
hosuva/W
huimaava/W
hukkuva/W
humiseva/W
huokaileva/W
huolehtiva/W
hupeneva/W
hurraava/W
huudattava/W
huutava/W
ihaileva/W
iloitseva/W
imarteleva/W
innostava/W
intoileva/W
irvaileva/W
istuva/W
jakaantuva/W
janoava/W
jatkuva/W
johdattava/W
johtuva/W
joustava/W
joutuva/W
julkaiseva/W
juokseva/W
kaatava/W
kaduttava/W
kahlaava/W
kaipaava/W
kaivattava/W
kajastava/W
kalvava/W
kannustava/W
kapeneva/W
karkaileva/W
kasautuva/W
kasvava/W
katkova/W
katsova/W
katuva/W
kaunistava/W
kavahtava/W
kehuva/W
keimaileva/W
kelpaava/W
kiehtova/W
kieppuva/W
kiinnostava/W
kimaltava/W
kirkastuva/W
koettava/W
kohdistuva/W
kohoava/W
kohtaava/W
koituva/W
kokeva/W
kokoontuva/W
kompastuva/W
korjaava/W
korostava/W
korvaava/W
kouraiseva/W
koveneva/W
kukistuva/W
kukkuva/W
kuljettava/W
kuluttava/W
kumiseva/W
kunnioittava/W
kuohuttava/W
kuolettava/W
kurjistuva/W
kutiava/W
kutkuttava/W
kutsuttava/W
kuuleva/W
kuuluva/W
kuvaava/W
kuvottava/W
laajentava/W
lainehtiva/W
laskeva/W
laukaiseva/W
laulava/W
leijuva/W
leimuava/W
liehuva/W
liikkuva/W
liimaava/W
liukuva/W
lohduttava/W
loikkiva/W
loistava/W
lomaileva/W
loppuva/W
luettava/NW
luhistuva/W
lukeutuva/W
lumoava/W
luopuva/W
luova/NW
lupaava/W
maalaava/W
madaltava/W
mahtava/W
mainostava/W
majaileva/W
maksava/W
masentava/W
matkiva/W
mittaava/W
muhiva/W
mukautuva/W
muodostuva/W
mureneva/W
murskaava/W
mutkistava/W
muuttuva/W
nariseva/W
naurattava/W
nauttiva/W
nojaava/W
nopeutuva/W
nostava/W
noudattava/W
nouseva/W
nukuttava/W
odottava/W
ohjaava/W
ohjautuva/W
olettava/W
omistava/W
onnistuva/W
opastava/W
opiskeleva/W
orastava/W
osallistuva/W
ostava/W
ottava/W
paheksuva/W
pahentava/W
painiva/W
painuva/W
pajuttuva/W
pakottava/W
palauttava/W
paljastava/W
palkitseva/W
palvova/W
paneva/W
parantava/W
pelaava/W
pelottava/W
perustuva/W
pilaava/W
pilkutteleva/W
pohjautuva/W
poikkeava/W
poistuva/W
polttava/W
potkaiseva/W
puhaltava/W
puheleva/W
puhkeava/W
pukeva/W
punoittava/W
puoltava/W
pureva/W
purkautuva/W
puskeutuva/W
putoava/W
puuttuva/W
rahoittava/W
raikuva/W
rajoittava/W
rakastava/W
rakentuva/W
rasittava/W
ratkeava/W
rauhoittava/W
rehottava/W
riipaiseva/W
riivaava/W
rinnastuva/W
rohkaiseva/W
roikkuva/W
ruhjova/W
rullaava/W
ruokkiva/W
saalistava/W
saarnaava/W
saatteleva/W
sahaava/W
salaileva/W
salpaava/W
sattuva/W
seisova/W
sekoittuva/W
sidottava/W
sijoittuva/W
sitoutuva/W
siunaava/W
sointuva/W
soittava/W
soljuva/W
sopeutuva/W
soveltava/W
sovittava/W
suhiseva/W
suhteuttava/W
sukiva/W
sulava/W
sulkeva/W
suodattava/W
suojautuva/W
suorittava/W
suosiva/W
sureva/W
suuntaava/W
suureneva/W
suututtava/W
taisteleva/W
takaava/W
tallentava/W
tanhuava/W
tapaava/W
tappava/W
tarkentava/W
tarttuva/W
tarvitseva/W
tavoitteleva/W
tempaava/W
tiedostava/W
tienaava/W
tiukkeneva/W
toimittava/W
toistuva/W
toljottava/W
torjuva/W
toteuttava/W
totuttava/W
tuhoava/W
tukehtuva/W
tukeva/W
tulkitseva/W
tummeneva/W
tunkeileva/W
tunkeva/W
tunteva/NW
tuoksuva/W
tuova/NW
turmeleva/W
turvaava/W
uhkaava/W
uhmaava/W
uhrautuva/W
ulottuva/W
ulvova/W
unettava/W
upottava/W
uskova/W
uudistuva/W
uurtava/W
uuvuttava/W
vaaniva/W
vaativa/W
vahingoittava/W
vaihtava/W
vaihtuva/W
vaikuttava/W
vakiintuva/W
valaiseva/W
valikoituva/W
vallitseva/W
valmistuva/W
valtaava/W
vanhahtava/W
vapauttava/W
varaava/W
varmistava/W
varsova/W
vastaava/W
vaurastuva/W
vertaileva/W
vieraannuttava/W
vierastava/W
vihaava/W
vihlova/W
vilkkuva/W
vivahtava/W
vuotava/W
